Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-232.04
School lands; irrigable; development.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is authorized to and shall take all necessary action for the development of irrigable school lands located within the boundaries of an irrigation district, so that such lands may benefit from irrigation. The cost of such development shall be paid by the board from funds available to the board for the administration of unsold school lands, and such costs shall be included in the costs certified to the State Treasurer pursuant to section 72-232.02.

Laws 1971, LB 581, § 2.